North Carolina, session 2025, SB875.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 35 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-269.9. Purchase or possession of firearms by person convicted of misdemeanor crime
of domestic violence.
(a) Offense. – It is unlawful for a person to possess, purchase, or receive or attempt to
possess, purchase, or receive a firearm, as defined in G.S. 14-409.39, machine gun, ammunition,
or permits to purchase or carry concealed firearms if the person has been adjudicated guilty of or
received a prayer for judgment continued or suspended sentence for an offense (i) under
G.S. 14-32.5 or (ii) in another state that, if committed in this State, is substantially similar to an
offense under G.S. 14-32.5.
(b) Punishment. – A person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class A1
misdemeanor."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 14-32.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-32.5. Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence.
(a) Offense and Punishment. – A person is guilty of a Class A1 misdemeanor if that
person uses or attempts to use physical force, or threatens the use of a deadly weapon, against
another person and the person who commits the offense is:
(1) A current or former spouse, parent, or guardian of the victim.
(1a) A current or former intimate partner of the victim.
(2) A person with whom the victim shares a child in common.
(3) A person who is cohabitating with or has cohabitated with the victim as a
spouse, parent, or guardian.
(4) A person similarly situated to a spouse, parent, or guardian of the victim.
(5) A person who has a current or recent former dating relationship with the
victim.
…."
*S875-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Department of Administration, Domestic Violence Commission, the sum of one million dollars
($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to establish an educational
program on domestic violence.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 875-First Edition